Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-310
Application for certificate or permit; petition for relief; requirements.

Applications for certificates or permits and petitions for relief shall be made to the commission in writing and shall be in such form and contain such information as the commission shall by rule require. A summary of the authority or relief sought in an application or petition shall be given to interested persons according to the rules the commission shall adopt. After notice of an application or petition has been given to interested persons as provided by the rules for notice, the commission may process the application or petition without a hearing by use of affidavits if the application or petition is not opposed.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. III, § 10, p. 1381;

Laws 1967, c. 479, § 16, p. 1482.

Rule relating to tacking of authorities is within the ambit of authority granted to commission under this and other related sections. Nebraska State Railway Commission v. Seward Motor Freight, Inc., 188 Neb. 223, 196 N.W.2d 200 (1972).